Utah statutes.
32B-8-303.   Specific qualifications for resort spa sublicense.

(1)  A person employed to act in a supervisory or managerial capacity for the resort spa sublicense is subject to qualification requirements of Section 32B-8-203.

(2)  If a person no longer possesses the qualifications required by Section 32B-8-203 for obtaining the resort license or resort spa sublicense, the commission may suspend or revoke the resort spa sublicense that is part of the resort license.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

